District of Columbia statutes.
47-1807.53

Job growth tax credit eligibility.

The Mayor shall approve any job growth tax credits allowed by § 47-1807.52 if, during a credit period, a project shall:

(1)

Bring a net job growth of at least 10 new jobs to the District of Columbia with an average yearly wage of at least 120% of the average yearly wage of residents of the District of Columbia;

(2)

Increase income tax and payroll revenue for the District of Columbia;

(3)

Result in the retention of any new positions proposed by the project for at least one year; and

(4)

Be approved by the Mayor only if the project would not occur but for the job growth tax credit.

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-202, § 2(c), 57 DCR 4746
This section is referenced in § 47-1807.55.